Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0932.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (1) Before applying for a certificate under section 5, an electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall schedule and hold a public meeting in each municipality through which a proposed major transmission line for which a plan has been submitted under section 4 would pass. A public meeting held in a township satisfies the requirement that a public meeting be held in each affected village located within in the township. (2) In the 60 days before a public meeting held under subsection (1), the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall offer in writing to meet with the chief elected official of each affected municipality or his or her the chief elected official's designee to discuss the utility's, affiliated transmission company's, or independent transmission company's desire to build the major transmission line and to explore the routes to be considered. (3) At least 15 days before a public meeting held under subsection (1), an electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall provide notice to all of the following: (a) Each municipality and landowner with property located along the proposed and alternate routes identified for the proposed major transmission line. (b) Each municipality and landowner with property located within 1 mile of the centerline of the proposed right of way for the proposed and alternate routes identified for the proposed major transmission line. (c) Each municipality and landowner with property located within the geographic area between the proposed and alternate routes identified for the proposed major transmission line. (4) The notice required in subsection (3) must be by mail delivered to the taxpayer of record of the affected property and include all of the following: (a) The date, time, and location of all public meetings scheduled for the proposed major transmission line. (b) The case number of the docket established for the proposed major transmission line, including instructions on how the person can sign up though the commission's website to receive notifications about the docket. (c) A highlighted map of the proposed and alternate routes. (d) If the transmission line is more than 5 miles in length, a highlighted map of the geographic area within a 1 mile radius of any proposed or alternate routes, as well as the land between those routes. (e) The name, address, telephone number, and email address for a dedicated contact person who has knowledge of the development of the proposed major transmission line that is authorized to communicate on behalf of the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company. (f) Details regarding the specific type of information the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company is seeking from the landowners and municipalities, including all of the following: (i) Particular characteristics about the landowner's property. (ii) Land use. (iii) Features of historical or environmental significance. (g) Rights the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company is potentially seeking from the landowner. (5) The electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company is encouraged to identify and review multiple alternate routes with landowners and municipalities, developing a full understanding of land considerations and landowner comments when refining the final proposed and alternate routes included as part of the application submitted to the commission. (6) An electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall make meeting materials in substantially final form available to commission staff 10 business days before the applicant holds a public meeting under subsection (1). (7) An electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall allow landowners attending a public meeting to identify geographic features of their parcel or add comments, information regarding features of parcels or potential minor route adjustments, and any other pertinent information regarding the location of the proposed major transmission line. This information must be translated into a geographic information system to be used by the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company. An electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall provide a similar map-based interface on a website available to the public so that information and alternate routes may be submitted by landowners that were unable to attend a public meeting in person. The website must be available for at least 90 days after the last public meeting held as required under subsection (1). The electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall solicit route modifications, alternate segments, and alternate routes for the proposed major transmission line during the public meetings and from the map-based interface website. The evaluation factor data by route segment for route segments studied in the routing study that derived the construction plan must be made available during public meetings, as well as on the online map-based interface. Interested parties must be able to submit comments and feedback via a website available to the public before the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company files the application with the commission. All landowner comments and route adjustment requests received by the applicant and all applicant responses to those comments and requests must be thoroughly documented by the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company. Any substantive landowner request that is not granted must include a description of how the modification was considered and why it was not able to be reasonably accommodated. (8) During all public meetings, the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company shall provide the following information: (a) Transmission line details that relate to public health, including any post-construction testing or evaluation presented by a subject matter expert who is available to discuss electromagnetic field regulations and how the project is designed to meet or exceed those regulations. (b) The need for the line. (c) An estimated tax revenue due to the project, broken down by township. (d) The construction process and safety measures for the proposed major transmission line. (e) Environmental impact mitigation. (f) Rights the applicant is seeking from landowners. (g) A high-level overview of the landowner compensation process. (h) Post-construction property restoration procedures and requirements. (i) The case number of the docket established for the proposed major transmission line, including instructions on how the person can sign up though the commission's website to receive notifications about the docket.